Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.01
Personal watercraft; applicability of laws, rules, and regulations.

Except as provided in sections 37-1241.02 to 37-1241.08, a personal watercraft shall be subject to all applicable laws, rules, and regulations which govern the operation, equipment, registration, and numbering of and all other matters relating to vessels whenever a personal watercraft is operated on the waters of this state.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 102.